Utah statutes.
75-3-903.   Right of retainer.
The amount of a noncontingent indebtedness of a successor to the estate if
due, or its present value if not due, shall be offset against the successor's
interest; but the successor has the benefit of any defense which would be
available to him in a direct proceeding for recovery of the debt.
